District of Columbia statutes.
34-101

Applicability of this subtitle.

This subtitle shall apply to the transportation of passengers, freight, or property from 1 point to another within the District of Columbia, and any common carrier performing such service; and this subtitle shall be so applicable and be so construed as to be free from conflict with those provisions of the Constitution of the United States and the laws in pursuance thereof relating to interstate commerce.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 977, ch. 150, § 8, par. 1

History

1981 Ed., § 43-222.
1973 Ed., § 43-122.

Prior Codifications